New York, session 2025-2026, A7035.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new article 16-B 2 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 16-B 4 OFFICE OF BLACK MALE EXCELLENCE 5 Section 340. Definitions. 6 341. Office of black male excellence. 7 342. Powers and duties. 8 § 340. Definitions. For purposes of this article, the following terms 9 shall have the following meanings: 10 1. The term "director" means the director of the office of black male 11 excellence. 12 2. The term "office" means the office of black male excellence estab- 13 lished by this article. 14 § 341. Office of black male excellence. There is hereby established in 15 the executive department the office of black male excellence. The office 16 shall be headed by the director, who shall be appointed by the governor. 17 The director shall appoint staff and perform such other functions to 18 ensure the efficient operation of the office within the amounts made 19 available therefor by appropriation. 20 § 342. Powers and duties. The director shall have the power and duty 21 to: 22 1. Analyze and provide recommendations to the governor, the legisla- 23 ture, and relevant state agencies on issues including, but not limited 24 to, black male: education, criminal justice, health, mental health, 25 economic opportunity, employment, fatherhood, mentorship, violence, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10405-01-5 A. 7035 2 1 public safety, and quality of life. Such recommendations shall acknowl- 2 edge any inequities black males experience in these issue areas. 3 2. Serve as a liaison to other state agencies and the public on any 4 black male issues identified by the office under subdivision one of this 5 section. 6 3. No later than January thirty-first of each year, the office shall 7 submit to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the 8 speaker of the assembly, and shall post to the office's website a report 9 summarizing the office's analyses and recommendations required under 10 subdivision one of this section, and the office's activities during the 11 previous calendar year, including, but not limited to: 12 (a) The number of individuals who interacted with the office, disag- 13 gregated by demographic and geographic information. 14 (b) The number and category of programs offered by the office. 15 (c) Any recommendations regarding improvements to state or municipal 16 services and programs. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.